Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB62.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVIII-BREDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY STARTUP LOAN PROGRAMSection 1801-B. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Redevelopment Authority Startup Fund established in this article."Qualified county." A county, other than a county of the first class or county of the second class."Qualified redevelopment authority." A public body and body corporate and politic created and organized in accordance with the provisions of the act of May 24, 1945 (P.L.991, No.385), known as the Urban Redevelopment Law, and established and located in a qualified county. "Startup loan." A loan issued to a qualified redevelopment authority from the fund.Section 1802-B. (Reserved).Section 1803-B. Redevelopment Authority Startup Loan Program.The Redevelopment Authority Startup Loan Program is established in the department.Section 1804-B. Application and approval process.20250SB0062PN0942 - 2 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132 (a) Application.--A qualified redevelopment authority may apply to the department for a startup loan as provided under this article. An application made under this subsection must be submitted in a form and manner required by the department.(b) Application period.--A qualified redevelopment authority may submit an application to the department for a startup loan beginning from January 1, 2026, until the earlier of the following:(1) the date on which all money appropriated by the General Assembly to the fund has been awarded as startup loans; or(2) January 1, 2028.(c) Review.--When reviewing applications for startup loans, the department shall:(1) Provide a startup loan from the fund to one or more qualified redevelopment authorities in one or more qualified counties, if the qualified redevelopment authority or authorities in the qualified county or counties have applied and the qualified county or counties are in compliance with all requirements established by the department.(2) Give priority to a qualified redevelopment authority in a qualified county with existing municipal blight programs, if the qualified redevelopment authority has applied in that qualified county.(d) (Reserved).(e) Loan amounts.--A startup loan may not exceed $500,000.Section 1805-B. Startup loans.(a) Eligible uses.--Except as provided under subsection (b), a startup loan may be used by a qualified redevelopment authority only for the following purposes:20250SB0062PN0942 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The purchase of a residential property or a commercial property by a qualified redevelopment authority . (2) The cost of redevelopment of a residential property or a commercial property purchased under paragraph (1) or owned by the qualified redevelopment authority.(3) The cost of remediating a residential property or a commercial property purchased under paragraph (1) or owned by the qualified redevelopment authority.(4) The necessary costs or administrative expenses to execute the activities in paragraph (1), (2) or (3), not to exceed 5% of the amount of the startup loan.(b) Ineligible uses.--A startup loan may not be used to pay for any of the following:(1) The operating expenses of the qualified redevelopment authority.(2) The refinancing or reduction of a debt or obligation incurred prior to the award of the startup loan.(c) Required repayment.--A qualified redevelopment authority that is awarded a startup loan must enter into a contract for the repayment of the startup loan in accordance with the terms provided under subsection (d).(d) Repayment terms.--A startup loan shall be subject to the following terms and conditions:(1) The term of the startup loan may not exceed 10 years.(2) The interest rate of the startup loan may not exceed 2% per year.(3) The department may require the qualified redevelopment authority to provide collateral sufficient in the department's determination to protect the Commonwealth's 20250SB0062PN0942 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 interest in the startup loan.(e) Deposit of repayment amounts.--The amount of principal and interest repaid by a qualified redevelopment authority shall be deposited into the fund.Section 1806-B. Redevelopment Authority Startup Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Redevelopment Authority Startup Fund is established in the State Treasury as a revolving loan fund. The money in the fund is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purpose of making startup loans under this article and paying administrative expenses under subsection (d) (C) . (b) Deposits.--The following shall be deposited into the fund:(1) Amounts appropriated or transferred by act of the General Assembly to the fund.(2) Amounts repaid under section 1805-B(e).(c) Interfund transfer.--The State Treasurer shall transfer $10,000,000 from the General Fund to the fund.(d) (C) Administrative expenses.--The amount of administrative expenses of the department paid from the fund in any fiscal year may not exceed 2% of the amount of startup loans awarded in that fiscal year.(e) (D) Guidelines.--The department may issue guidelines to implement this article.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0062PN0942 - 5 - <--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425